Utah statutes.
63H-3-106.   Officer or employee -- No forfeiture of office or employment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, an officer or employee of this state does not forfeit an office of or employment within the state by reason of the person's acceptance of membership on the authority or service on it.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 370, 2011 General Session

